Nevada, session 83, AB160.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 231 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, “Commission” means the Nevada-
Ireland Trade Commission created by section 3 of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby created the Nevada-Ireland
Trade Commission, consisting of the following nine members:
(a) Two members of the Senate, appointed by the Majority
Leader of the Senate;
(b) Two members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly; and
(c) Five members appointed by the Governor, including,
without limitation:
(1) A representative of the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
(2) A representative of a chamber of commerce or trade
association; and
(3) A representative of the general public who represents
Irish-American communities or interests in this State.
2. After the initial terms, each member of the Commission
serves a term of 2 years. A member of the Commission may be
reappointed.
3. The membership of any member of the Commission who is
a Legislator and who is not a candidate for reelection or who is
defeated for reelection terminates on the day next after the general
election.
4. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Commission must be filled in the same manner as the original
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
appointment. A member appointed to fill a vacancy serves as a
member of the Commission for the remainder of the original term
of appointment.
5. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Commission, is
entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 4. 1. The members of the Commission shall elect a
Chair and Vice Chair from among its members. After the initial
election, the Chair and Vice Chair serve for a term of 1 year
beginning on July 1 of each year. If the position of Chair or Vice
Chair becomes vacant, the members of the Commission shall elect
a Chair or Vice Chair, as appropriate, from among its members
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
2. The Commission shall meet at the call of the Chair or a
majority of the members of the Commission.
3. A majority of the members of the Commission constitutes a
quorum and is required to transact any business of the
Commission.
4. The Office shall provide the Commission with such
administrative support as is necessary to assist the Commission in
carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. The Commission shall study and make
recommendations to the Board regarding:
(a) Advancing bilateral trade and investment between Nevada
and Ireland;
(b) Initiating joint action on policy issues of mutual interest to
Nevada and Ireland;
(c) Promoting business and academic exchanges between
Nevada and Ireland;
(d) Encouraging mutual economic support between Nevada
and Ireland;
(e) Encouraging mutual investment in the infrastructure of
Nevada and Ireland; and
(f) Such other issues as determined by the Commission.
2. On or before October 1 of each year, the Commission
shall:
(a) Prepare a written report of its activities during the
immediately preceding fiscal year and any recommendations; and
(b) Submit a copy of the written report prepared pursuant to
paragraph (a) to:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(1) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) If the report is prepared in an even-numbered year,
the next regular session of the Legislature; or
(II) If the report is prepared in an odd-numbered year,
the Legislative Commission.
(2) The Governor.
Sec. 6. 1. The Account for the Nevada-Ireland Trade
Commission is hereby created in the State General Fund.
2. The Commission shall administer the Account. The money
in the Account must be used only to carry out the provisions of
sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act, including, without limitation,
for payment of administrative costs and expenses relating to travel,
meals and lodging.
3. The Commission may apply for any available grants and
accept gifts, grants, bequests and other contributions from any
public or private source for deposit in the Account.
4. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting applicable charges, must be credited to
the Account.
5. Money in the Account must remain in the Account and
must not revert to the State General Fund at the end of any fiscal
year.
Sec. 7. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)